District of Columbia statutes.
44-1003.06

Notice to facility owner or administrator; informal conference.

(a)

Before a resident is transferred or discharged under § 44-1003.05(a)(1) through (3), the Mayor shall provide the licensee or administrator of the facility with a written notice stating the reasons for the intended action and informing the licensee or administrator of his or her right to an informal conference and a subsequent hearing. The licensee or administrator may contest a nonemergency transfer or discharge by submitting to the Mayor a written request for an informal conference within 4 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays) after he or she receives notice of the proposed transfer or discharge. A timely request for an informal conference shall stay the nonemergency transfer or discharge pending the Mayor’s decision after the conference.

(b)

The Mayor shall hold an informal conference within 4 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays) after a timely request for the conference is received. Following the conference, the Mayor shall affirm, modify, or reverse his or her previous decision to transfer or discharge the resident.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 306, 33 DCR 1510
1981 Ed., § 32-1436.